Washington statutes.
RCW 11.24.020

Filing of will contest petition—Notice.

Upon the filing of the petition referred to in RCW 11.24.010, notice shall be given as provided in RCW 11.96A.100 to the executors who have taken upon themselves the execution of the will, or to the administrators with the will annexed, to all legatees named in the will or to their guardians if any of them are minors, or their personal representatives if any of them are dead, and to all persons interested in the matter, as defined in *RCW 11.96A.030(5).

[ 2006 c 360 s 9; 1965 c 145 s 11.24.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 16; RRS s 1386; prior: 1891 p 382 s 9; Code 1881 s 1361; 1863 p 214 s 97; 1860 p 176 s 64.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 11.96A.030 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (5) to subsection (6).

Clarification of laws—Enforceability of act—Severability—2006 c 360: See notes following RCW 11.108.070.